North Carolina statutes. Chapter 96. Employment Security.
Article 2D. Administration of Benefits.
§ 96-17.
Protection of rights and benefits; attorney representation; prohibited fees; deductions for child support obligations.

Waiver of Rights Void. — Any agreement by an individual to waive, release, or commute his rights to benefits or any other rights under this Chapter shall be void. Any agreement by any individual in the employ of any person or concern to pay all or any
portion of an employer’s contributions, required under this Chapter from such employer, shall be void. No employer shall directly or indirectly make or require or accept any deduction from the remuneration of individuals in his
employ to finance the employer’s contributions required from him, or require or accept any waiver of any right hereunder by any individual in his employ. Any employer or officer or agent of an employer who violates any provision
of this subsection shall, for each offense, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.

Representation. — Any claimant or employer who is a party to any proceeding before the Division may be represented by (i) an attorney; or (ii) any person who is supervised by an attorney, however, the attorney need not be present at any proceeding before
the Division.

(b1)

Fees Prohibited. —
Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, no individual claiming benefits in any administrative proceeding under this Chapter shall be charged fees of any kind by the Division or its representative, and in
any court proceeding under this Chapter each party shall bear its own costs and legal fees.

No Assignment of Benefits; Exemptions. — Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, any assignment, pledge, or encumbrance of any right to benefits which are or may become due or payable under this Chapter shall be void; and such rights to
benefits shall be exempt from levy, execution, attachment, or any other remedy whatsoever provided for the collection of debts; and benefits received by any individual, so long as they are not mingled with other funds of the recipient,
shall be exempt from any remedy whatsoever for the collection of all debts except debts incurred for necessaries furnished to such individual or his spouse or dependents during the time when such individual was unemployed. Any
waiver of any exemption provided for in this subsection shall be void.

Definitions. — For the purpose of this subsection and when used herein:

“Unemployment compensation” means any compensation found by the Division to be payable to an unemployed individual under the Employment Security Law of North Carolina (including amounts payable by the Division pursuant to an agreement under any federal
law providing for compensation, assistance or allowances with respect to unemployment) provided, that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the Division’s ability to reduce or withhold benefits,
otherwise payable, under authority granted elsewhere in this Chapter including but not limited to reductions for wages or earnings while unemployed and for the recovery of previous overpayments of benefits.

“Child support obligation” includes only obligations which are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in section 454 of the Social Security Act which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services under Part D of Title IV of the
Social Security Act.

“State or local child support enforcement agency” means any agency of this State or a political subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in subparagraph b. above.

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing such claim, disclose whether the individual owes child support obligations, as defined under subparagraph (1)b. of this subsection. If any such individual discloses
that he or she owes child support obligations and is determined by the Division to be eligible for payment of unemployment compensation, the Division shall notify the State or local child support enforcement agency
enforcing such obligation that such individual has been determined to be eligible for payment of unemployment compensation.

Upon payment by the State or local child support enforcement agency of the processing fee provided for in paragraph (4) of this subsection and beginning with any payment of unemployment compensation that, except for the provisions of this subsection,
would be made to the individual during the then current benefit year and more than five working days after the receipt of the processing fee by the Division, the Division shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment
compensation otherwise payable to an individual who owes child support obligations:

The amount specified by the individual to the Division to be deducted and withheld under this paragraph if neither subparagraph 2. nor subparagraph 3. of this paragraph is applicable; or

The amount, if any, determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the Division under section 454(20)(B)(i) of the Social Security Act by the State or local child support enforcement agency, unless subparagraph 3. of this paragraph is applicable; or

Any amount otherwise required to be so deducted and withheld from such unemployment compensation pursuant to properly served legal process, as that term is defined in section 462(e) of the Social Security Act.

Any amount deducted and withheld under paragraph b. of this subdivision shall be paid by the Division to the appropriate State or local child support enforcement agency.

The Department of Health and Human Services and the Division are hereby authorized to enter into one or more agreements which may provide for the payment to the Division of the processing fees referred to in subparagraph b. and the payment to the Department
of Health and Human Services of unemployment compensation benefits withheld, referred to in subparagraph c., on an open account basis. Where such an agreement has been entered into, the processing fee shall be deemed
to have been made and received (for the purposes of fixing the date on which the Division will begin withholding unemployment compensation benefits) on the date a written authorization from the Department of Health
and Human Services to charge its account is received by the Division. Such an authorization shall apply to all processing fees then or thereafter (within the then current benefit year) chargeable with respect to
any individual name in the authorization. Any agreement shall provide for the reimbursement to the Division of any start-up costs and the cost of providing notice to the Department of Health and Human Services of
any disclosure required by subparagraph a. Such an agreement may dispense with the notice requirements of subparagraph a. by providing for a suitable substitute procedure, reasonably calculated to discover those
persons owing child support obligations who are eligible for unemployment compensation payments.

Any amount deducted and withheld under paragraph (2) of this subdivision shall, for all purposes, be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and then paid by such individual to the State or local child support enforcement
agency in satisfaction of the individual’s child support obligations.

On or before April 1 of 1983 and each calendar year thereafter, the Division shall set and forward to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for use in the next fiscal year, a schedule of processing fees for the withholding and payment of unemployment
compensation as provided for in this subsection, which fees shall reflect its best estimate of the administrative cost to the Division generated thereby.

At least 20 days prior to September 25, 1982, the Division shall set and forward to the Secretary of Health and Human Services an interim schedule of fees which will be in effect until July 1, 1983.

The provisions of this subsection apply only if arrangements are made for reimbursement by the State or local child support agency for all administrative costs incurred by the Division under this subsection attributable to child support obligations enforced
by the agency.

History.
Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, s. 15; 1937, c. 150; 1979, c. 660, s. 22; 1981, c. 762, ss. 1, 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1178, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 552, s. 21; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-456, s. 27; 2011-401, s. 2.18.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 2.18, effective November 1, 2011, substituted “Division” for “Commission” throughout the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1982 administrative law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 961 (1983).

§ 96-18.
Penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person to make a false statement or representation knowing it to be false or to knowingly fail to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any benefit under this Chapter or under an employment security law of any other
state, the federal government, or of a foreign government, either for himself or any other person. Records, with any necessary authentication thereof, required in the prosecution of any criminal action brought by another
state or foreign government for misrepresentation to obtain benefits under the law of this State shall be made available to the agency administering the employment security law of any such state or foreign government for
the purpose of such prosecution. Photostatic copies of all records of agencies of other states or foreign governments required in the prosecution of any criminal action under this section shall be as competent evidence
as the originals when certified under the seal of such agency, or when there is no seal, under the hand of the keeper of such records.

A person who violates this subsection shall be found guilty of a Class I felony if the value of the benefit wrongfully obtained is more than four hundred dollars ($400.00).

A person who violates this subsection shall be found guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the value of the benefit wrongfully obtained is four hundred dollars ($400.00) or less.

Any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit or any other person who makes a false statement or representation, knowing it to be false, or who knowingly fails to disclose a material fact to prevent or reduce the payment of benefits
to any individual entitled thereto, or to avoid becoming or remaining subject hereto or to avoid or reduce any contributions or other payment required from an employing unit under this Chapter, or who willfully fails or refuses
to furnish any reports required hereunder, or to produce or permit the inspection or copying of records as required hereunder, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor; and each such false statement or representation or failure
to disclose a material fact, and each day of such failure or refusal shall constitute a separate offense. (b1) Except as provided in this subsection, the penalties and other provisions in subdivisions (6), (7), (9a), and (11) of

G.S. 105-236

apply to unemployment insurance contributions under this Chapter to the same extent that they apply to taxes as defined in G.S. 105-228.90(b)(7). The Division has the same powers under those subdivisions with respect
to unemployment insurance contributions as does the Secretary of Revenue with respect to taxes as defined in G.S. 105-228.90(b)(7).G.S. 105-236(9a) applies to a “contribution tax return preparer” to the same extent as it applies
to an income tax preparer. As used in this subsection, a “contribution tax return preparer” is a person who prepares for compensation, or who employs one or more persons to prepare for compensation, any return of tax imposed by
this Chapter or any claim for refund of tax imposed by this Chapter. For purposes of this definition, the completion of a substantial portion of a return or claim for refund is treated as the preparation of the return or claim
for refund. The term does not include a person merely because the person (i) furnishes typing, reproducing, or other mechanical assistance, (ii) prepares a return or claim for refund of the employer, or an officer or employee of
the employer, by whom the person is regularly and continuously employed, (iii) prepares as a fiduciary a return or claim for refund for any person, or (iv) represents a taxpayer in a hearing regarding a proposed assessment.The
penalty in

G.S. 105-236

(7) applies with respect to unemployment insurance contributions under this Chapter only when one of the following circumstances exist in connection with the violation:

Any employing units employing more than 10 employees.

A contribution of more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) has not been paid.

An experience rating account balance is more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) overdrawn.If none of the circumstances set forth in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection exist in connection with a violation of G.S. 105-236(7) applied under
this Chapter, the offender is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and each day the violation continues constitutes a separate offense.If the Division finds that any person violated G.S. 105-236(9a) and is not subject to a fraud
penalty, the person shall pay a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500.00) per violation for each day the violations continue, plus the reasonable costs of investigation and enforcement.

Any person who shall willfully violate any provisions of this Chapter or any rule or regulation thereunder, the violation of which is made unlawful or the observance of which is required under the terms of this Chapter, or for which a penalty is neither
prescribed herein nor provided by any other applicable statute, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and each day such violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate offense.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 625, s. 15.

An individual shall not be entitled to receive benefits for a period of 52 weeks beginning with the first day of the week following the date that notice of determination or decision is mailed finding that he, or another in his behalf with his knowledge,
has been found to have knowingly made a false statement or misrepresentation, or who has knowingly failed to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any benefit or other payment under this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 625, s. 15.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-134, s. 4(b), effective October 1, 2012.

Any person who has received any sum as benefits under this Chapter by reason of the nondisclosure or misrepresentation by him or by another of a material fact (irrespective of whether such nondisclosure or misrepresentation was known or fraudulent) or
has been paid benefits to which he was not entitled for any reason (including errors on the part of any representative of the Division) shall be liable to repay such sum to the Division as provided in subdivision (3) of
this subsection.

The Division may collect the overpayments provided for in this subsection by one or more of the following procedures as the Division may, except as provided herein, in its sole discretion choose:

If, after due notice, any overpaid claimant shall fail to repay the sums to which he was not entitled, the amount due may be collected by civil action in the name of the Division, and the cost of such action shall be taxed to the claimant. Civil actions
brought under this section to collect overpayments shall be heard by the court at the earliest possible date and shall be entitled to preference upon the calendar of the court over all other civil actions except
petitions for judicial review under this Chapter.

If any overpayment recognized by this subsection shall not be repaid within 30 days after the claimant has received notice and demand for same, and after due notice and reasonable opportunity for hearing (if a hearing on the merits of the claim has not
already been had) the Division, under the hand of the Assistant Secretary, may certify the same to the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the claimant resides or has property, and additional copies
of said certificate for each county in which the Division has reason to believe such claimant has property located; such certificate and/or copies thereof so forwarded to the clerk of the superior court shall immediately
be docketed and indexed on the cross index of judgments, and from the date of such docketing shall constitute a preferred lien upon any property which said claimant may own in said county, with the same force and
effect as a judgment rendered by the superior court. The Division shall forward a copy of said certificate to the sheriff or sheriffs of such county or counties, or to a duly authorized agent of the Division, and
when so forwarded and in the hands of such sheriff or agent of the Division, shall have all the force and effect of an execution issued to such sheriff or agent of the Division by the clerk of the superior court
upon a judgment of the superior court duly docketed in said county. The Division is further authorized and empowered to issue alias copies of said certificate or execution to the sheriff or sheriffs of such county
or counties, or a duly authorized agent of the Division in all cases in which the sheriff or duly authorized agent has returned an execution or certificate unsatisfied; when so issued and in the hands of the sheriff
or duly authorized agent of the Division, such alias shall have all the force and effect of an alias execution issued to such sheriff or duly authorized agent of the Division by the clerk of the superior court upon
a judgment of the superior court duly docketed in said county. Provided, however, that notwithstanding any provision of this subsection, upon filing one written notice with the Division, the sheriff of any county
shall have the sole and exclusive right to serve all executions and make all collections mentioned in this subsection and in such case, no agent of the Division shall have the authority to serve any executions or
make any collections therein in such county. A return of such execution or alias execution, shall be made to the Division, together with all monies collected thereunder, and when such order, execution or alias is
referred to the agent of the Division for service, the said agent of the Division shall be vested with all the powers of the sheriff to the extent of serving such order, execution or alias and levying or collecting
thereunder. The agent of the Division to whom such order or execution is referred shall give a bond not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) approved by the Division for the faithful performance of such duties.
The liability of said agent shall be in the same manner and to the same extent as is now imposed on sheriffs in the service of execution. If any sheriff of this State or any agent of the Division who is charged
with the duty of serving executions shall willfully fail, refuse or neglect to execute any order directed to him by the said Division and within the time provided by law, the official bond of such sheriff or of
such agent of the Division shall be liable for the overpayments and costs due by the claimant. Additionally, the Division or its designated representatives in the collection of overpayments shall have the powers
enumerated in G.S. 96-10(b)(2) and (3).

Any person who has been found by the Division to have been overpaid under subparagraph (2) above due to fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation shall be liable to have the sums deducted from future benefits payable to the person under this Chapter.
The amount deducted may be up to one hundred percent (100%) of that person’s weekly benefit amount.

Any person who has been found by the Division to have been overpaid under subparagraph (2) above due to nonfraudulent reasons shall be liable to have the sums deducted from future benefits payable to the person under this Chapter but the amount deducted
for any week shall be reduced by no more than fifty percent (50%) of that person’s weekly benefit amount.

To the extent permissible under the laws and Constitution of the United States, the Division is authorized to enter into or cooperate in arrangements or reciprocal agreements with appropriate and duly authorized agencies of other states or the United
States Secretary of Labor, or both, whereby: (1) Overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under subparagraphs (1) and (2) above shall be recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable
under the unemployment compensation law of another state, and overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under the unemployment compensation law of such other state shall be recovered by offset from unemployment
benefits otherwise payable under this Chapter; and, (2) Overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under applicable federal law, with respect to benefits or allowances for unemployment provided under a
federal program administered by this State under an agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor, shall be recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable under this Chapter or any such federal
program, or under the unemployment compensation law of another state or any such federal unemployment benefit or allowance program administered by such other state under an agreement with the United States Secretary
of Labor if such other state has in effect a reciprocal agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor as authorized by Section 303(g)(2) of the federal Social Security Act, if the United States agrees, as
provided in the reciprocal agreement with this State entered into under such Section 303(g)(2) of the Social Security Act, that overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under subparagraphs (1) and (2)
above, and overpayment as determined under the unemployment compensation law of another state which has in effect a reciprocal agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor as authorized by Section 303(g)(2)
of the Social Security Act, shall be recovered by offset from benefits or allowances for unemployment otherwise payable under a federal program administered by this State or such other state under an agreement with
the United States Secretary of Labor.

The Division may in its discretion decline to collect overpayments to claimants if the claimant has deceased after the payment was made. In such a case the Division may remove the debt of the deceased claimant from its records.

Mandatory Federal Penalty. — A person who has been held ineligible for benefits under subsection (e) of this section and who, because of those same acts or omissions, has received any sum as benefits under this Chapter to which the person is not entitled
shall be assessed a penalty in an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the amount of the erroneous payment. The penalty amount shall be payable to the Unemployment Insurance Fund. The penalty applies to an erroneous payment
made under any State program providing for the payment of unemployment compensation as well as an erroneous payment made under any federal program providing for the payment of unemployment compensation. The notice of determination
or decision advising the person that benefits have been denied or adjusted pursuant to subsection (e) of this section must include the reason for the finding of an erroneous payment, the penalty amount assessed under this subsection,
and the reason the penalty has been applied.The penalty amount may be collected in any manner allowed for the recovery of the erroneous payment, except that the penalty amount may not be recovered through offsets of future benefits.
When a recovery with respect to an erroneous payment is made, any recovery applies first to the principal of the erroneous payment, then to the federally mandated penalty amount imposed under this subsection, and finally to any
other amounts due.

History.
Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, s. 16; 1943, c. 319; c. 377, ss. 29, 30; 1945, c. 552, s. 34; 1949, c. 424, s. 26; 1951, c. 332, s. 16; 1953, c. 401, ss. 1, 22; 1955, c. 385, s. 9; 1959, c. 362, ss. 19, 20; 1965, c. 795, ss. 23, 24;
1971, c. 673, s. 31; 1977, c. 727, s. 55; 1979, c. 660, ss. 23-25; 1981, c. 160, s. 33; 1983, c. 625, s. 15; 1985, c. 552, s. 22; 1987, c. 103, s. 4; 1989, c. 583, ss. 13, 14; 1993, c. 343, s. 7; c. 539, ss. 674-676; 1994, Ex. Sess.,
c. 24, s. 14(c); 2003-67, s. 2; 2005-410, s. 6; 2011-401, s. 2.19; 2012-134, ss. 3(d), 4(a)-(c); 2013-2, s. 9(d); 2013-224, s. 19.

§ 96-18.1.
Attachment and garnishment of fraudulent overpayment.

Applicability. — This section applies to an individual who has been provided notice of a determination or an appeals decision finding that the individual, or another individual acting in the individual’s behalf and with the individual’s knowledge, has
knowingly done one or more of the following to obtain or increase a benefit or other payment under this Chapter:

Made a false statement or misrepresentation.

Failed to disclose a material fact.

Attachment and Garnishment. — Intangible property that belongs to an individual, is owed to an individual, or has been transferred by an individual under circumstances that would permit it to be levied upon if it were tangible property is subject to
attachment and garnishment in payment of a fraudulent overpayment that is due from the individual and is collectible under this Article. Intangible personal property includes bank deposits, rent, salaries, wages, property held
in the Escheat Fund, and any other property incapable of manual levy or delivery.A person who is in possession of intangible property that is subject to attachment and garnishment is the garnishee and is liable for the amount the
individual owes. The liability applies only to the amount of the individual’s property in the garnishee’s possession, reduced by any amount the individual owes the garnishee.The Secretary may submit to a financial institution,
as defined in

G.S. 53B-2

, information that identifies an individual who owes a fraudulent overpayment that is collectible under this section and the amount of the overpayment. The Secretary may submit the information on a quarterly basis
or, with the agreement of the financial institution, on a more frequent basis. A financial institution that receives the information must determine the amount, if any, of intangible property it holds that belongs to the individual
and must inform the Secretary of its determination. The Secretary must reimburse a financial institution for its costs in providing the information, not to exceed the amount payable to the financial institution under

G.S. 110-139

for providing information for use in locating a noncustodial parent.No more than ten percent (10%) of an individual’s wages or salary is subject to attachment and garnishment. The wages or salary of an employee of
the United States, the State, or a political subdivision of the State are subject to attachment and garnishment.

Notice. — Before the Secretary attaches and garnishes intangible property in payment of a fraudulent overpayment, the Secretary must send the garnishee a notice of garnishment. The notice must be sent either in person, by certified mail with a return
receipt requested, or with the agreement of the garnishee, by electronic means. The notice must contain all of the following information:

The individual’s name.

The individual’s social security number or federal identification number.

The amount of fraudulent overpaid benefits the individual owes.

An explanation of the liability of a garnishee for fraudulent overpayment of unemployment insurance benefits owed by an overpaid individual.

An explanation of the garnishee’s responsibility concerning the notice.

Action. — A garnishee must comply with a notice of garnishment or file a written response to the notice within the time set in this subsection. A garnishee that is a financial institution must comply or file a response within 20 days after receiving
a notice of garnishment. All other garnishees must comply or file a response within 30 days after receiving a notice of garnishment. A written response must explain why the garnishee is not subject to garnishment and attachment.Upon
receipt of a written response, the Department must contact the garnishee and schedule a conference to discuss the response or inform the garnishee of the Department’s position concerning the response. If the Department does not
agree with the garnishee on the garnishee’s liability, the Department may proceed to enforce the garnishee’s liability for the fraudulent overpayment of unemployment benefits by civil action.

History.
2013-2, s. 7(b); 2013-224, s. 19.

§ 96-19.
Enforcement of Employment Security Law discontinued upon repeal or invalidation of federal acts; suspension of enforcement provisions contested.

It is the purpose of this Chapter to secure for employers and employees the benefits of Title III and Title IX of the Federal Social Security Act, approved August 14, 1935, as to credit on payment of federal taxes, of State contributions, the receipt
of federal grants for administrative purposes, and all other provisions of the said Federal Social Security Act; and it is intended as a policy of the State that this Chapter and its requirements for contributions by employers
shall continue in force only so long as such employers are required to pay the federal taxes imposed in said Federal Social Security Act by a valid act of Congress. Therefore, if Title III and Title IX of the said Federal Social
Security Act shall be declared invalid by the United States Supreme Court, or if such law be repealed by congressional action so that the federal tax cannot be further levied, from and after the declaration of such invalidity by
the United States Supreme Court, or the repeal of said law by congressional action, as the case may be, no further levy or collection of contributions shall be made hereunder. The enactment by the Congress of the United States
of the Railroad Retirement Act and the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act shall in no way affect the administration of this law except as herein expressly provided.All federal grants and all contributions theretofore collected,
and all funds in the treasury by virtue of this Chapter, shall, nevertheless, be disbursed and expended, as far as may be possible, under the terms of this Chapter: Provided, however, that contributions already due from any employer
shall be collected and paid into the said fund, subject to such distribution; and provided further, that the personnel of the Division of Employment Security shall be reduced as rapidly as possible.The funds remaining available
for use by the Division of Employment Security shall be expended, as necessary, in making payment of all such awards as have been made and are fully approved at the date aforesaid, and the payment of the necessary costs for the
further administration of this Chapter, and the final settlement of all affairs connected with same. After complete payment of all administrative costs and full payment of all awards made as aforesaid, any and all moneys remaining
to the credit of any employer shall be refunded to such employer, or his duly authorized assignee: Provided, that the State employment service, created by Chapter 106, Public Laws of 1935, and transferred by Chapter 1, Public Laws
of 1936, Extra Session, and made a part of the former Employment Security Commission of North Carolina, and that is now part of the Division of Employment Security of the North Carolina Department of Commerce, shall in such event
return to and have the same status as it had prior to enactment of Chapter 1, Public Laws of 1936, Extra Session, and under authority of Chapter 106, Public Laws of 1935, shall carry on the duties therein prescribed; but, pending
a final settlement of the affairs of the Division, the said State employment service shall render such service in connection therewith as shall be demanded or required under the provisions of this Chapter or the provisions of Chapter
1, Public Laws of 1936, Extra Session.

The Division of Employment Security may, upon receiving notification from the U.S. Department of Labor that any provision of this Chapter is out of conformity with the requirements of the federal law or of the U.S. Department of Labor, suspend the enforcement
of the contested section or provision until the North Carolina Legislature next has an opportunity to make changes in the North Carolina law. The Division shall, in order to implement the above suspension:

Notify the Governor’s office and provide that office with a copy of the determination or notification of the U.S. Department of Labor;

Advise the Governor’s office as to whether the contested portion or provision of the law would, if not enforced, so seriously hamper the operations of the agency as to make it advisable that a special session of the legislature be called;

Take all reasonable steps available to obtain a reprieval from the implementation of any federal conformity failure sanctions until the State legislature has been afforded an opportunity to consider the existing conflict.

History.
1937, c. 363; 1939, c. 52, s. 8; 1947, c. 598, s. 1; 1977, c. 727, s. 56; 2011-401, s. 2.20.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 2.20, effective November 1, 2011, in subsection (a), in the second paragraph, substituted “Division of Employment Security” for “State Employment Security Commission” at the end, in the third paragraph, in the first paragraph,
substituted “Division of Employment Security” for “North Carolina Employment Security Commission,” and in the last sentence, inserted “former” and “and that is now part of the Division of Employment Security of the North Carolina Department
of Commerce,” and substituted “Division” for “Employment Commission of North Carolina”; and in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b), substituted “Division of Employment Security” and “Division” for “Employment Security Commission.”

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on employment regulation, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 854 (1978).